Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1282.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 2401, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2401. Sections 4 2401 through 10 2407 of this act title
shall be known and may be cited as the "Oklahoma State Regents'
Academic Rising Scholars Award Act.".

SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 2402, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2402. A. There is hereby created the Oklahoma State
Regents' Academic Rising Scholars Award Program. The purpose of the
Oklahoma State Regents' Academic Rising Scholars Award Program is to
retain top-ranked students from Oklahoma in Oklahoma colleges,
enable Oklahoma institutions of higher education to compete
aggressively for top Oklahoma scholars, attract high-caliber out-of-
state students to Oklahoma to attend colleges and universities, and
enhance the academic quality in Oklahoma colleges and universities.
The program shall provide participants funding for enrollment fees,
tuition and other fees, room and board and required textbooks or
materials for up to five (5) years of undergraduate and/or graduate
study at accredited institutions of higher education in Oklahoma.
B. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall
administer the provisions of the Oklahoma State Regents' Academic
Rising Scholars Award Program.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 2403, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2403. A. No person shall be eligible to participate in
the Oklahoma State Regents' Academic Rising Scholars Award Program
unless the person:
1. Has complied with all of the rules promulgated by the
Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education pursuant to the
provisions of the Oklahoma State Regents' Academic Rising Scholars
Award Act, Section 2401 et seq. of this title, for the award,
regulation, and administration of scholarships; and
2. Qualifies as one of the following:
a. an Individual Applicant Qualified Student, which shall
mean a student who is a resident of the State of
Oklahoma whose American College Testing Program score
or whose Scholastic Aptitude Test score falls within
the 99.5 to 100.0 percentile levels as administered in
the State of Oklahoma and whose grade point average
and/or class rank is exceptional, as determined by the
State Regents,
ENR. H. B. NO. 1282 Page 2

b. a Presidential Scholar, which shall mean a student
selected by the Commission on Presidential Scholars
administered by the United States Department of
Education,
c. a National Merit Scholar, which shall mean a student
designated as a National Merit Scholar by the National
Merit Scholarship Corporation,
d. a National Merit Finalist, which shall mean a student
designated as a National Merit Finalist by the
National Merit Scholarship Corporation, or
e. after October 1, 1999, an Institutional Nominee, which
shall mean a student nominated by an institution in
The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education:
(1) whose American College Testing Program or
Scholastic Aptitude Test score falls within the
95.0 to 99.49 percentile levels, or
(2) who shows exceptional academic achievement as
evidenced by factors, including, but not limited
to, grade point average, class rank, national
awards, scholastic achievements, honors, and who
shows exceptional promise based on documentation
that may include, but not be limited to, teacher
recommendations, extracurricular activities, and
evidence of overcoming economic and social
obstacles as determined by the State Regents.
The State Regents shall ensure that standards of
high academic ability are documented.
Scholarship awards to Institutional Nominees
shall become effective when appropriate
documentation is verified by the State Regents.
B. No person shall be eligible to receive a scholarship
pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma State Regents' Academic
Rising Scholars Award Program unless the person is enrolled as a
full-time student at a public or private accredited institution of
higher education in Oklahoma.
C. The For a student who qualifies pursuant to subparagraphs a
through d of paragraph 2 of subsection A of this section and subject
to the availability of funds, the Oklahoma State Regents' Academic
ENR. H. B. NO. 1282 Page 3

Rising Scholars Award Program shall provide a scholarship in an
amount not to exceed the average costs of all enrollment fees,
tuition and other fees, room and board, and all required textbooks
or materials for up to five (5) years of undergraduate and/or
graduate study at an accredited public or private institution of
higher education in Oklahoma as provided in subsection E of this
section. The State Regents may establish separate scholarship award
levels for each qualifying category.
1. If the student is attending an institution within The
Oklahoma State System of Higher Education, the total funding for the
scholarship provided in this subsection, exclusive of any
internships, shall not exceed the costs for items specified in this
subsection at the institution attended as determined annually by the
Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education.
2. If the student is attending a private institution of higher
education, the total funding for the scholarship provided in this
subsection, exclusive of any internships, shall not exceed the costs
for items specified in this subsection at an institution of The
Oklahoma State System of Higher Education of comparable type which
has the highest general enrollment fees of its type of institution
in The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education as determined
annually by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education.
D. For a student who qualifies pursuant to subparagraph e of
paragraph 2 of subsection A of this section and subject to the
availability of funds, the Oklahoma Rising Scholars Award Program
shall provide a scholarship in an amount not to exceed the average
costs of all enrollment fees and other fees, room and board, and all
required textbooks or materials for up to five (5) years of
undergraduate and/or graduate study at an accredited public or
private institution of higher education in Oklahoma. The State
Regents may establish separate scholarship award levels for each
qualifying category.
1. If the student is attending an institution within The
Oklahoma State System of Higher Education, the institution shall
provide a tuition waiver not to exceed the average cost of tuition.
The total funding for the scholarship and waiver provided for
students attending an institution within The Oklahoma State System
of Higher Education as provided in this subsection, exclusive of any
internships, shall not exceed the costs for items specified in this
subsection at the institution attended as determined annually by the
Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1282 Page 4

2. If the student is attending a private institution of higher
education in Oklahoma, the scholarship shall include an amount not
to exceed the average cost of tuition. The total funding for
scholarships for students attending a private institution as
provided in this subsection, exclusive of any internships, shall not
exceed the costs for items specified in this subsection at an
institution within The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education of
comparable type which has the highest general enrollment fees of its
type of institution in The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education
as determined annually by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education.
E. If a person identifies himself or herself as a student with
a disability and requests consideration for a scholarship under the
Academic Oklahoma Rising Scholars Award Program by means other than
standard testing procedures, the State Regents shall determine what
means of assessment are appropriate and upon the basis of said
assessment results, determine what level of award, if any, shall be
made.
E. 1. If the student is attending an institution of The
Oklahoma State System of Higher Education, the total funding for the
scholarship provided in this section, exclusive of any internships,
shall not exceed the costs for items specified in subsection C of
this section at the institution attended as determined annually by
the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education.
2. If the student is attending a private institution of higher
education, the total funding for the scholarship provided in this
section, exclusive of any internships, shall not exceed the costs
for items specified in subsection C of this section at an
institution of The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education of
comparable type which has the highest general enrollment fees of its
type institution in The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education as
determined annually by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education.
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 2404, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2404. A. Scholarships awarded under the Oklahoma State
Regents' Academic Rising Scholars Award Program shall be awarded to
all eligible applicants without any limitation on the number of
scholarships to be awarded in any year other than the amount of
ENR. H. B. NO. 1282 Page 5

funds available for the scholarship program and the number of
eligible applicants.
B. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education may, at the
time a scholarship is awarded to a student, set aside in the
Oklahoma State Regents' Academic Rising Scholars Award Trust Fund
funds for the full five-year commitment made to such eligible
scholar. For all academic years, students who have previously
received academic scholarships under the provisions of this act and
who have continued at all times to fulfill the requirements for
eligibility to receive academic scholarships provided in this act
shall be given an absolute priority for continued financial support
by the Oklahoma State Regents' Academic Rising Scholars Award
Program superior to any students who are applying for such academic
scholarships awards for the first time.
C. In addition to the qualifications specified in Section 2403
of this title, the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education may
adopt additional criteria for selection and allocation of awards
which may include, but are not limited to, consideration of high
school academic performance and personal interviews. The Oklahoma
State Regents for Higher Education shall annually report on the
number of former Academic Rising Scholars Award Program participants
who stay in state as compared to those who leave Oklahoma within
five (5) years of leaving the Award Program. In addition, the
Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education are hereby authorized to
determine a maximum number of awards or a maximum amount of funding
which may go to nonresident students. Such maximum limitations
shall not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the awards or amount
of funding in any category provided in paragraph 2 of subsection A
of Section 2403 of this title.
SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 2405, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2405. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education
may adopt rules and regulations, prescribe and provide appropriate
forms for application, and employ such persons, contract for such
services and make such additional expenditures as may be necessary
or appropriate for implementing the provisions of the Oklahoma State
Regents' Academic Rising Scholars Award Act; provided, as part of
the regulations adopted for administration of the provisions of the
Oklahoma State Regents' Academic Rising Scholars Award Program, the
Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall require that each
scholarship recipient make continuing and satisfactory progress
ENR. H. B. NO. 1282 Page 6

toward a degree, including the establishment of an annual minimum
grade point average and annual minimum credit hours to be maintained
by the participants. Such regulations shall also provide for
revoking or rescinding assistance to any scholarship recipient who
fails to meet such required standards. Such regulations shall also
provide that the funds made available to students as part of the
Oklahoma State Regents' Academic Rising Scholars Award Program shall
be paid directly to the institution of the student's choice, in
trust for the student, and on the student's behalf, and shall
contain appropriate restrictions and conditions that such monies are
expended only for the purposes authorized by this act. Such
regulations shall also provide for portability of award for a
recipient among accredited institutions of higher education in
Oklahoma in which the recipient may enroll as long as the recipient
meets requirements of the program; however, waivers shall only be
portable between institutions in The Oklahoma State System of Higher
Education and waiver portability may be further limited by the
Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education rules and regulations.
SECTION 6. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 2406, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2406. The Oklahoma State Regents' Academic Rising
Scholars Award Act shall not be construed as granting any authority
to control or influence the policies of any educational institution
because it accepts students who are participating in the scholarship
program, or to require any such institution to admit, or once
admitted to continue in such institution, any participant in the
scholarship program.
SECTION 7. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 2407, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2407. As part of its duties in administering the
Oklahoma State Regents' Academic Rising Scholars Award Program, the
Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education, in cooperation with the
State Board of Education, shall encourage Oklahoma high school
juniors who plan to attend college to take the Preliminary
Scholastic Aptitude Test/National Merit Scholarship Qualifying Test
in their junior year in high school as preparation for taking the
Scholastic Aptitude Test their senior year in high school.
SECTION 8. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1282 Page 7

SECTION 9. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1282 Page 8

Passed the House of Representatives the 28th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 28th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1282 Page 9